Utah statutes.
53A-24-405.   Appointment of advisory council.

(1)  The board shall appoint an advisory council to advise and assist the office, DSDHH, and, as appropriate, the board in matters relating to the needs of individuals with hearing impairments and the activities of DSDHH.

(2)  At least one-third of the members of the council shall be individuals with hearing impairments.

(3)  Members may be reimbursed for authorized actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.



Amended by Chapter 78, 1990 General Session

